District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0836.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA,
21 That this bill may be cited as the "Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority Gold
22 Line Bus Rapid Transit Phase 1 Fiscal Year 2027 and 2028 Reimbursable Agreement
23 Emergency Act of 2026".
24 Sec. 2. (a) Pursuant to section 45l(c)(3) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act,
25 approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 803; D.C. Official Code§ 1-204.51(c)(3)), the
26 Council approves the multiyear Reimbursable Agreement for more than $1 million with
27 the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority to develop a bus rapid transit
28 system on H Street and Benning Road between Union Station and RFK Stadium named
29 the "Gold Line". The Mayor submitted on September XX, 2026 a reimbursable agreement
30 with the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority ("WMA TA") to perform
31 planning, environmental, and outreach, through preliminary (30%) design, of Phase 1 of the
32 Gold Line which will support the development of the Hand Benning Street corridors, Union
33 Station and the area surrounding the existing RFK Stadium.

34 (b) The Council approves the maximum total expenditure under this multiyear
35 contract with WMATA in the amount of $5,000,000.
36 Sec. 3. The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement provided by the Chief
37 Financial Officer as the fiscal impact statement required by section 4a of the General
38 Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C.
39 Official Code § 1-301.47a).
40 Sec. 4. This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event
41 of veto by the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect
42 for no longer than 90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of
43 Columbia in section 412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
44 December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
2

Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia
FROM: Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
DATE: September 15, 2026
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement – Washington Metropolitan Area Transit
Authority Gold Line Bus Rapid Transit Phase I Multiyear Reimbursable
Agreement Emergency Act of 2026
REFERENCE: Draft Bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on September 2,
2026
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the revised fiscal year 2026 budget and the fiscal year 2027 through fiscal year
2030 budget and financial plan to implement the bill.
Background
In 2025, the District and the Washington Commanders football team reached an agreement for the
Commanders to return to a stadium in the District for the team’s home games and act as a catalyst
for ancillary development under the Robert F. Kennedy Campus Master Plan. In addition to the
stadium construction and residential, retail, and commercial developments surrounding the stadium,
significant transportation improvements are required to support the stadium and development.
In July 2026, the WMATA Board of Directors authorized the WMATA General Manager to enter into
a multiyear reimbursable agreement with the District to support the development of the Gold Line
Bus Rapid Transit (BRT) Phase I through the 30 percent design phase. Subsequently, the District and
WMATA agreed WMATA would contract for the planning, environmental reviews, and community
engagement with $5 million provided by the District. The agreement covers the design of the Gold
Line BRT from Union Station to Benning Road, N.E. at the entry point to the RFK Campus. The
agreement establishes that the 30 percent design and environmental reviews should be completed
by the third quarter of calendar year 2027. The agreement acknowledges that funding has not been
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority Gold Line Bus Rapid Transit Phase I Multiyear
Reimbursable Agreement Emergency Act of 2026,” Draft Bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on
September 2, 2026
identified for final designs, permitting, construction, operations, and maintenance of the Gold Line
BRT.
The bill approves the multiyear reimbursable agreement between the District and WMATA and
approves the maximum of $5 million included in the capital budget to be expended on the agreement.
Financial Plan Impact
Funds are sufficient in the proposed revised fiscal year 2026 budget and proposed fiscal year 2027
through fiscal year 2030 budget and financial plan to implement the bill. The fiscal year 2027 through
fiscal year 2032 capital improvements plan includes $5 million1 to support the agreement with
WMATA to complete 30 percent design on the Gold Line BRT. The bill’s approval will allow the Mayor
and the Director of the District Department of Transportation to execute the multiyear reimbursable
agreement with WMATA.
1 The District Department of Transportation will reimburse WMATA from its Bus Priority and Efficiency
Initiative capital project which is funded at over $95 million over the six-year capital improvement plan.
Page 2 of 2

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL
ATTORNEY GENERAL ATTORNEY-CLIENT COMMUNICATION
LEGAL COUNSEL DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: September 11, 2026
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review of the “Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority
Gold Line Bus Rapid Transit Phase 1 Fiscal Year 2027 and 2028 Reimbursable
Agreement Emergency Act of 2026” and the “Fiscal Year 2027 and 2028
Reimbursable Agreement with Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority
Gold Line Bus Rapid Transit Phase 1 Approval and Payment Authorization
Emergency Declaration Resolution of 2026”
(AE-26-445)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
the Office of the Attorney General has reviewed the
above-referenced legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this
regard, please do not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
_________________________________
Adele El-Khouri
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, N.W., 3S uite 409, Washington, D.C. 20004
Phone (202) 262-6402 Email: adele.el-khouri@dc.gov